Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201648-676
Short-time compensation program; plan;
effective date; notice of approval; expiration; revocation; termination.

(1) A short-time
compensation plan shall be effective on the date that is mutually agreed upon
by the employer and the commissioner, which shall be specified in the notice
of approval to the employer. The plan shall expire on the date specified in
the notice of approval, which shall be either the date at the end of the twelfth
full calendar month after its effective date or an earlier date mutually agreed
upon by the employer and the commissioner.

(2) If a short-time
compensation plan is revoked by the commissioner under section 48-677, the
plan shall terminate on the date specified in the commissioner's written order
of revocation.

(3) An employer may terminate a short-time compensation plan at
any time upon written notice to the commissioner. Upon receipt of such notice
from the employer, the commissioner shall promptly notify each member of the
affected unit of the termination date.

(4) An employer may submit a new application
to participate in another short-time compensation plan at any time after the
expiration or termination date.

Laws 2014, LB961, § 17.